Missouri, session 2026, SB1610.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 173, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 173.2541, to read as
follows:
173.2541. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Homeless pupils", includes any person who
satisfies the definition of "homeless children and youths"
established in 42 U.S.C. Section 11434a(2) and any person
who satisfies the definition of "unaccompanied youth"
established in 42 U.S.C. Section 11434a(6);
(2) "Liaison", the liaison for postsecondary education
for homeless pupils established in this section.
2. There is hereby established the liaison for
postsecondary education for homeless pupils within the
department of higher education and workforce development.
3. There is hereby created in the state treasury the
"Liaison for Postsecondary Education for Homeless Pupils
Fund", which shall consist of moneys appropriated by the
general assembly or any gifts, donations, or bequests for
the purpose of implementing the provisions of this section.

SB 1610 2
The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In
accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state
treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund shall be a
dedicated fund and money in the fund shall be used solely by
the department of higher education and workforce development
for the purposes of implementing the provisions of this
section. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080
to the contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the end
of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund. The state treasurer shall invest
moneys in the fund in the same manner as other funds are
invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such
investments shall be credited to the fund.
4. The governor shall, subject to appropriations,
appoint the liaison for a term of four years. The
individual appointed:
(1) Shall be knowledgeable in the various issues
relating to homeless pupils, including, but not limited to,
the McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act of 1987, 42
U.S.C. Section 11431, et seq.;
(2) Shall be independent of and have no pecuniary
interest in any other organization or entity that provides
services to homeless pupils;
(3) Shall devote all of such individual's time to the
business of such individual's office and shall not pursue
any other business or vocation or hold any other office of
profit; and
(4) Shall not be a member of any political party or a
member of any committee of any political party.
5. The governor may remove the liaison from office for
inefficiency, neglect of duty, or malfeasance in office.
6. Subject to appropriations, the liaison shall:

SB 1610 3
(1) Conduct an annual analysis of homeless pupils in
this state to assess the needs of such pupils;
(2) Develop a database to track, monitor, and analyze
trends in the rates of graduation and retention of homeless
pupils;
(3) Develop a model for college and career readiness
for homeless pupils;
(4) Collaborate with high school staff members
responsible for assisting homeless and unaccompanied pupils;
(5) Collaborate with high schools to identify homeless
pupils to refer such pupils to appropriate support services
after the admission of such pupils to an institution of
higher education within this state;
(6) Establish connections between and collaborate with
financial aid offices, student support services, and campus
housing services of institutions of higher education within
this state;
(7) Identify and refer homeless pupils to mentoring
programs;
(8) Increase awareness among teachers, instructors,
professors, and other staff members of institutions of
higher education in this state who work with pupils on
issues relating to homeless pupils, including, without
limitation, identifying such pupils and referring such
pupils to appropriate resources;
(9) Establish and maintain a database of food banks,
clothing banks, and low-cost health care providers, to be
provided, without limitation, to financial aid offices and
student support services of institutions of higher education;
(10) Identify and coordinate with food banks and
clothing banks or establish one or more food banks or
clothing banks on a campus of an institution of higher

SB 1610 4
education within this state to provide services to homeless
pupils;
(11) Establish a plan for housing homeless pupils when
campus housing is not available, including, without
limitation, establishing a list of host homes in the local
community and keeping one or more campus housing buildings
open; and
(12) Apply for and accept grants awarded through the
College Cost Reduction and Access Act of 2007, Pub. L. 110-
84.
7. Subject to appropriations, the liaison may:
(1) Employ such staff as is necessary to carry out the
liaison's duties and the functions of the liaison's office,
in accordance with any applicable personnel practices and
procedures established by the coordinating board for higher
education. The liaison has sole discretion to employ and
remove any member of the liaison's staff;
(2) Purchase necessary equipment;
100 (3) Lease or make other suitable arrangements for
101 office space, provided that any lease that extends beyond
102 the term of one year shall be reviewed and approved by the
103 commissioner of administration; and
104 (4) Perform such other functions and make such other
105 arrangements as may be necessary to carry out the liaison's
106 duties and the functions of the liaison's office.
✓